District of Columbia statutes.
22-936

Penalties.

(a)

A person who commits the offense of criminal abuse or criminal neglect of a vulnerable person shall be subject to a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisoned for not more than 180 days, or both.

(b)

A person who commits the offense of criminal abuse or criminal neglect of a vulnerable adult which causes serious bodily injury or severe mental distress shall be subject to a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisoned up to 10 years, or both.

(c)

A person who commits the offense of criminal abuse or criminal neglect of a vulnerable adult which causes permanent bodily harm or death shall be subject to a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisoned up to 20 years, or both.

History

June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 206, 47 DCR 7039
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 208, 60 DCR 2064

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-801 and § 22-951.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “up to $1,000” in (a), for “up to $100,000” in (b), and for “up to $250,000” in (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 208 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.